Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 135A.15, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Campus deleted text begin investigation and disciplinary hearing proceduresdeleted text end new text begin sexual misconduct grievance proceduresnew text end . (a) A postsecondary institution must provide a reporting party an opportunity for an impartial, timely, and thorough investigation of a report of sexual misconduct against a student. If an investigation reveals that sexual misconduct has occurred, the institution must take prompt and effective steps reasonably calculated to end the sexual misconduct, prevent its recurrence, and, as appropriate, remedy its effects. new text begin (b) An institution must offer and coordinate academic and residential supportive measures as needed and equitably to both the reporting and responding parties participating in a campus sexual misconduct grievance process, including but not limited to exam or assignment extensions, permitted class absence, a change in on-campus residence, and schedule changes. new text end new text begin (c) An institution must allow the reporting and responding parties to present and review relevant evidence. Testimony by the parties and witnesses must be compiled in an investigative report. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Throughout any investigation or disciplinary proceeding, deleted text begin a postsecondarydeleted text end new text begin annew text end institution must treat the reporting parties, responding parties, witnesses, and other participants in the proceeding with dignity and respect. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end If deleted text begin a postsecondarydeleted text end new text begin annew text end institution conducts a hearing, deleted text begin an advisordeleted text end new text begin the reporting and responding partynew text end may provide opening and closing remarksnew text begin , or the party's advisor may provide opening or closing remarksnew text end on behalf of deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin thenew text end party or assist with formulating questions to the other party or witnesses about related evidence or credibility. new text begin (f) An institution must allow equal opportunity during the hearing for the reporting and responding party to consult an additional support person other than the advisor, such as an advocate, if requested and deemed appropriate by the Title IX coordinator. new text end new text begin (g) The reporting and responding party must be given equal opportunity to question the credibility of the other party and witnesses through a live hearing or questioning by a decision-maker, pursuant to paragraph (i). new text end new text begin (h) If an institution allows for cross-examination of witnesses and parties, the reporting party and the responding party are not permitted to personally cross-examine each other or any witnesses. Any cross-examination must be performed by the party's advisor or an adjudicator of the campus disciplinary proceeding. new text end new text begin (i) An institution must appoint a decision-maker or panel of decision-makers who are not the investigator to assess the credibility of the reporting party, the responding party, and any other witness through a live hearing or direct questioning. new text end new text begin (j) If the facts and circumstances rise to a policy violation, an institution must proceed with the campus sexual misconduct grievance process concurrently with a criminal investigation if requested by the reporting party. new text end new text begin (k) Personal information of the reporting party such as character witness or sexual behavior of the reporting party is allowable if it is deemed relevant by the decision-maker and if it substantiates that the misconduct may have occurred. Mental health and medical information of the reporting party may be considered if: (1) a release is signed by the reporting party; and (2) nonrelevant information is redacted. If a responding party is found responsible, medical and mental health information of the reporting party may be considered to determine sanctions. new text end new text begin (l) Questions and evidence about the reporting party's sexual predisposition or prior sexual behavior are not considered relevant, unless such questions and evidence: (1) are offered to prove that someone other than the responding party committed the alleged conduct; or (2) concern specific incidents of the reporting party's prior sexual behavior with respect to the responding party and are offered to prove consent. new text end new text begin (m) The responding and reporting parties may discuss the investigation and disciplinary proceedings with their advisor of choice, parents, or an authorized legal guardian. new text end new text begin (n) An institution must use the preponderance of the evidence standard of proof if an allegation involves a student. new text end new text begin (o) An institution must deliver the outcome of the grievance process simultaneously to the reporting and responding parties. new text end new text begin (p) An institution must inform the reporting and responding parties no later than 24 hours before a decision is rendered regarding the timeline of the outcome's release. Alongside the notice of the outcome, an institution must offer community mental health and, if applicable, on-campus resources equitably to a reporting and responding party. The outcome must not be delivered to a reporting or responding party at the end of the day or on a weekend or holiday to ensure that the reporting and responding parties may access supportive services. new text end new text begin (q) Institutions must have a policy prohibiting retaliation that specifies what constitutes retaliation and possible actions for students and employees if retaliation occurs. Retaliation against the reporting party, responding party, or witness resulting from a person's participation in a campus sexual misconduct investigation is prohibited. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 135A.1582, is amended to read: 135A.1582 PROTECTIONS FOR PREGNANT AND PARENTING STUDENTS. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Definitiondeleted text end new text begin Definitionsnew text end . (a) For the purpose of this section, the following deleted text begin term hasdeleted text end new text begin terms havenew text end the deleted text begin meaningdeleted text end new text begin meaningsnew text end given. (b) "Parenting student" means a student enrolled at a public college or university who is the parent or legal guardian of or can claim as a dependent a child under the age of 18. new text begin (c) "Pregnancy or related conditions" means: (1) pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or lactation; (2) medical conditions related to pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or lactation; or (3) recovery from pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, lactation, or related medical conditions. new text end new text begin (d) "Postsecondary institution" means an institution governed by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or a private postsecondary institution that offers in-person courses on a campus located in Minnesota and that is an eligible institution as defined in section 136A.103. Institutions governed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota are requested to comply with this section. new text end Subd. 2. Rights and protections. (a) A deleted text begin Minnesota state college or universitydeleted text end new text begin postsecondary institutionnew text end may not require and the University of Minnesota is requested not to require a pregnant or parenting student, solely because of the student's status as a pregnant or parenting student or due to issues related to the student's pregnancy or parenting, to: (1) take a leave of absence or withdraw from the student's degree or certificate program; (2) limit the student's studies; (3) participate in an alternative program; (4) change the student's major, degree, or certificate program; or (5) refrain from joining or cease participating in any course, activity, or program at the college or university. (b) A deleted text begin Minnesota state college or universitydeleted text end new text begin postsecondary institutionnew text end shall provide and the University of Minnesota is requested to provide reasonable modifications to a pregnant student, including modifications that: (1) would be provided to a student with a temporary medical condition; or (2) are related to the health and safety of the student and the student's unborn child, such as allowing the student to maintain a safe distance from substances, areas, and activities known to be hazardous to pregnant women or unborn children. (c) A deleted text begin Minnesota state college or universitydeleted text end new text begin postsecondary institutionnew text end must and the University of Minnesota is requested to, for reasons related to a student's pregnancy, childbirth, or any resulting medical status or condition: (1) excuse the student's absence; (2) allow the student to make up missed assignments or assessments; (3) allow the student additional time to complete assignments in the same manner as the institution allows for a student with a temporary medical condition; and (4) provide the student with access to instructional materials and video recordings of lectures for classes for which the student has an excused absence under this section to the same extent that instructional materials and video recordings of lectures are made available to any other student with an excused absence. (d) A deleted text begin Minnesota state college or universitydeleted text end new text begin postsecondary institutionnew text end must and the University of Minnesota is requested to allow a pregnant or parenting student to: (1) take a leave of absence; and (2) if in good academic standing at the time the student takes a leave of absence, return to the student's degree or certificate program in good academic standing without being required to reapply for admission. (e) If a deleted text begin public college or universitydeleted text end new text begin postsecondary institutionnew text end provides early registration for courses or programs at the institution for any group of students, the deleted text begin Minnesota state college or universitydeleted text end new text begin institutionnew text end must provide and the University of Minnesota is requested to provide early registration for those courses or programs for pregnant or parenting students in the same manner. Subd. 3. Policy on discrimination. Each deleted text begin Minnesota state college or universitydeleted text end new text begin postsecondary institutionnew text end must adopt and the University of Minnesota is requested to adopt a policy for students on pregnancy and parenting discrimination. The policy must: (1) include the contact information of the Title IX coordinator who is the designated point of contact for a student requesting each protection or modification under this section. Contact information must include the Title IX coordinator's name, phone number, email, and office; (2) be posted in an easily accessible, straightforward format on the college or university's website; and (3) be made available annually to faculty, staff, and employees of the college or university. Subd. 4. Administration. The commissioner of the Office of Higher Education must, in consultation with the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, new text begin and other relevant stakeholders, new text end establish guidelines, as necessary, to administer this section. The guidelines must establish minimum periods for which a pregnant or parenting student must be given a leave of absence under subdivision 2, paragraph (d). In establishing the minimum periods, the Office of Higher Education shall consider the maximum amount of time a student may be absent without significantly interfering with the student's ability to complete the student's degree or certificate program. Sec. 3. new text begin [136A.054] CONSOLIDATED COMPETITIVE GRANT AND STUDENT LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM REPORTING. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of the Office of Higher Education shall report annually by February 15, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over higher education, on the details of programs administered under sections 135A.137, 136A.1251, 136A.1788, 136A.1789, 136A.1791, 136A.1794, 136A.1795, 136A.246, 136A.861, 136A.901, and 136A.91 including the following, where applicable: new text end new text begin (1) organizations receiving grant awards; new text end new text begin (2) grant award amounts and utilization rates; new text end new text begin (3) grant program activities, goals, and outcomes; new text end new text begin (4) grant matching sources and funding levels; new text end new text begin (5) number and amount of loan repayment awards disbursed; and new text end new text begin (6) demographic data of loan repayment program participants. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must report any additional data and outcomes relevant to the evaluation of programs administered under sections 135A.137, 136A.1251, 136A.1788, 136A.1789, 136A.1791, 136A.1794, 136A.1795, 136A.246, 136A.861, 136A.901, and 136A.91 as evidenced by activities funded under each program. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.246, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Definitions. (a) The terms defined in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "Competency standard" has the meaning given in section 175.45, subdivision 2. (c) "Eligible training" means training provided by an eligible training provider that: (1) includes training to meet one or more identified competency standards; (2) is instructor-led for a majority of the training; and (3) results in the employee receiving an industry-recognized new text begin accredited new text end degree, certificate, or credential. (d) "Eligible training provider" means an institution: (1) operated by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; (2) licensed or registered as a postsecondary institution by the office; or (3) exempt from the provisions of section 136A.822 to 136A.834 or 136A.61 to 136A.71 as approved by the office. (e) "Industry-recognized new text begin accredited new text end degrees, certificates, or credentials" means: (1) certificates, diplomas, or degrees issued by a postsecondary institution; (2) registered apprenticeship certifications or certificates; (3) occupational licenses or registrations; (4) certifications issued by, or recognized by, industry or professional associations; and (5) other certifications as approved by the commissioner. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.246, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligible training provider. The Office of Higher Education and the Department of Labor and Industry must cooperate in maintaining an inventory of new text begin accredited new text end degree, certificate, and credential programs that provide training to meet competency standards. The inventory must be posted on each agency's website with contact information for each program. The postings must be updated periodically. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.87, is amended to read: 136A.87 PLANNING INFORMATION FOR POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION. (a) The office shall make available to all residents beginning in 7th grade through adulthood information about planning and preparing for postsecondary opportunities. Information must be provided to all 7th grade students and their parents annually by September 30 about planning for their postsecondary education. The office may also provide information to high school students and their parents, to adults, and to out-of-school youth. deleted text begin (b) The office shall gather and share information with students and parents about the dual credit acceptance policies of each Minnesota public and private college and university. The office shall gather and share information related to the acceptance policies for concurrent enrollment courses, postsecondary enrollment options courses, advanced placement courses, and international baccalaureate courses. This information must be shared on the office's website and included in the information under paragraph (a). deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The information provided under paragraph (a) may include the following: (1) the need to start planning early; (2) the availability of assistance in educational planning from educational institutions and other organizations; (3) suggestions for studying effectively during high school; (4) high school courses necessary to be adequately prepared for postsecondary education; (5) encouragement to involve parents actively in planning for all phases of education; (6) information about postsecondary education and training opportunities existing in the state, their respective missions and expectations for students, their preparation requirements, admission requirements, and student placement; (7) ways to evaluate and select postsecondary institutions; (8) the process of transferring credits among Minnesota postsecondary institutions and systems; (9) the costs of postsecondary education and the availability of financial assistance in meeting these costs, including specific information about the Minnesota Promise; (10) the interrelationship of assistance from student financial aid, public assistance, and job training programs; (11) financial planning for postsecondary education; and (12) postsecondary education options for students with intellectual and developmental disabilities. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.901, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Grant program. (a) The commissioner shall establish a grant program to award grants to institutions in Minnesota for research into spinal cord injuries and traumatic brain injuries. Grants shall be awarded to conduct research into new and innovative treatments and rehabilitative efforts for the functional improvement of people with spinal cord and traumatic brain injuries. Research topics may include, but are not limited to, pharmaceutical, medical device, brain stimulus, and rehabilitative approaches and techniques. The commissioner, in consultation with the advisory council established under section 136A.902, shall award 50 percent of the grant funds for research involving spinal cord injuries and 50 percent to research involving traumatic brain injuries. In addition to the amounts appropriated by law, the commissioner may accept additional funds from private and public sources. Amounts received from these sources are appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes of issuing grants under this section. new text begin (b) Institutions that are eligible to apply for a grant under this section include postsecondary institutions, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit organizations. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A spinal cord and traumatic brain injury grant account is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner to make grants and to administer the grant program under this section. Appropriations to the commissioner for the program are for transfer to the account. Appropriations from the account do not cancel and are available until expended. Sec. 8. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Student parent support. new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.1251, as Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.915. The revisor must also make cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Inclusive higher education. new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 135A.161, as Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.921. The revisor of statutes must renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 135A.162, as Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.922. The revisor must also make cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 5.41, subdivision 2; 136A.057; 136A.1251, subdivision 5; 136A.1788, subdivision 5; 136A.1791, subdivision 9; 136A.246, subdivision 9; 136A.861, subdivision 7; 136A.901, subdivision 2; and 136A.91, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 4850.0014, subparts 1 and 2, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00542 5.41 STUDY ABROAD PROGRAMS. No active language found for: 5.41.2 No active language found for: 136A.057 No active language found for: 136A.1251.5 No active language found for: 136A.1788.5 No active language found for: 136A.1791.9 136A.246 DUAL TRAINING COMPETENCY GRANTS. Subd. 9. Reporting. Commencing in 2017, the commissioner shall annually by February 1 report on the activity of the grant program for the preceding fiscal year to the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over workforce policy and finance. At a minimum, the report must include: (1) research and analysis on the costs and benefits of the grants for employees and employers; (2) the number of employees who commenced training and the number who completed training; and (3) recommendations, if any, for changes to the program. 136A.861 INTERVENTION FOR COLLEGE ATTENDANCE PROGRAM GRANTS. No active language found for: 136A.861.7 136A.901 SPINAL CORD INJURY AND TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY RESEARCH GRANT PROGRAM. Subd. 2. Report. By January 15, 2016, and each January 15 thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees having jurisdiction over the Office of Higher Education, specifying the institutions receiving grants under this section and the purposes for which the grant funds were used. No active language found for: 136A.91.3 Repealed Minnesota Rule: 25-00542 4850.0014 AMOUNT AND TERMS. § Subpart 1. [Repealed, L 2025 1Sp5 art 2 s 63] § Subp. 2. [Repealed, L 2025 1Sp5 art 2 s 63]